California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(g) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return (determined with regard to extension) for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 492.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.11.

(a) Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any losses sustained in the County of Santa Cruz as a result of the severe storms that occurred in March 2011.

(b) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return, determined with
 regard to extension, for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(c) Unless specifically provided otherwise, any law that suspends, defers, reduces, or otherwise diminishes the deduction of a net operating loss shall not apply to a net operating loss attributable to the loss described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 203, Sec. 2.   (AB 2332)   Effective August 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.12.

(a) Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any losses sustained in the Counties of Los Angeles and San Bernardino as a result of the severe winds that occurred in November 2011.

(b) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the
 return, determined with regard to extension, for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(c) Unless specifically provided otherwise, any law that suspends, defers, reduces, or otherwise diminishes the deduction of a net operating loss shall not apply to a net operating loss attributable to the loss described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 284, Sec. 2.   (SB 1544)   Effective September 7, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.13.

(a) Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be applicable to any losses sustained in the County of San Diego as a result of the wildfires that occurred in May 2014.

(b) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code may be made on a return or amended return filed on or before the due date of the return, determined with regard to
 extension, for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(c) Unless specifically provided otherwise, any law that suspends, defers, reduces, or otherwise diminishes the deduction of a net operating loss shall not apply to a net operating loss attributable to the loss described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 352, Sec. 2.   (AB 922)   Effective September 16, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

24347.14.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, and before January 1, 2029, Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disaster losses, shall be applicable to any loss sustained as a result of any disaster occurring in any city, county, or city and county in this state that is proclaimed by the Governor to be in a state of emergency.

(b) (1) For losses described in subdivision (a), the election under Section 165(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to disaster losses, may be made on a return or amended return filed
 on or before the due date of the return, determined with regard to any extension of time for filing the return, for the taxable year in which the disaster occurred.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 18572, this subdivision shall apply to any loss described in subdivision (a).

(c) Unless specifically provided otherwise, any law, other than Section 24416, that suspends, defers, reduces, or otherwise diminishes the deduction of a net operating loss shall not apply to a net operating loss attributable to the loss described in subdivision (a).

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1,
 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 285, Sec. 2.   (SB 264)   Effective September 30, 2023.   Repealed as of December 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

24348.

(a) There shall be allowed as a deduction either of the following:

(1) Debts which become worthless within the taxable year in an amount not in excess of the part charged off within that taxable year.

(2) In the case of a bank (as defined in Section 581 of the Internal Revenue Code), in lieu of any deduction under paragraph (1), in the discretion of the Franchise Tax Board, a reasonable addition to a reserve
 for bad debts determined in accordance with Section 585 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reserves for losses on loans of banks, except as otherwise provided.

(b) When satisfied that a debt is recoverable in part only, the Franchise Tax Board may allow that debt, in an amount not in excess of the part charged off within the taxable year, as a deduction; provided, however, that if a portion of a debt is claimed and allowed as a deduction in any year, no deduction shall be allowed in any subsequent year for any portion of the debt which in any prior year was charged off, regardless of whether claimed as a deduction in that prior year.

(c) (1) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply only to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(2) In the case of any bank, savings and loan association, or financial corporation (whether a taxpayer or a member of a combined reporting group) that maintained a reserve for bad debts for the last taxable year beginning before January 1, 2002, and that is required by the amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision to change its method of computing reserves for bad debts, all of the following shall apply:

(A) That change shall be treated as a change in a method of accounting.

(B) That change shall be treated as initiated by the bank, savings and loan association, or financial corporation (whether a taxpayer or a member of a combined reporting group).

(C) That change shall be treated as made with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(D) The net amount of adjustments required by Article 6 (commencing with Section 24721) of Chapter 13 to be taken into account by the bank, savings and loan association, or financial corporation (whether a taxpayer or a member of a combined reporting group):

(i) Shall be determined by taking into account only 50 percent of the “applicable excess reserves” (as defined in subdivision (d)), and

(ii) As so determined, shall be taken into account on the last day of the first taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002.

(iii) The amount of “applicable excess reserves” in excess of the amount taken into account under clause (i) of this subparagraph shall be reduced to zero and shall not be taken into account for purposes of this part.

(d) (1) In the case of a large bank (as defined in Section 585(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code), or a financial corporation that is not allowed to use the reserve for bad debts under Section 585 of the Internal Revenue Code, the term “applicable excess reserves” means the balance of the reserves described in former subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) (prior to the amendments made by the act adding this subdivision) as of the close of the last taxable year beginning before January 1, 2002.

(2) In all other cases, the term “applicable excess reserves” shall be zero and shall not be taken into account for purposes of this part.

(e) The amount of “applicable excess reserves” not taken into account pursuant to clause (iii) of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) or
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) shall not affect the amount of the allowable deduction under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 488, Sec. 9.   Effective September 12, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

24349.

(a) There shall be allowed as a depreciation deduction a reasonable allowance for the exhaustion, wear and tear (including a reasonable allowance for obsolescence)—

(1) Of property used in the trade or business; or

(2) Of property held for the production of income.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), for taxable years ending
 after December 31, 1958, the term “reasonable allowance” as used in subdivision (a) shall include, but shall not be limited to, an allowance computed in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, under any of the following methods:

(1) The straight-line method.

(2) The declining balance method, using a rate not exceeding twice the rate that would have been used had the annual allowance been computed under the method described in paragraph (1).

(3) The sum of the years-digits method.

(4) Any other consistent method productive of an annual allowance that, when added to all allowances for the period commencing with the taxpayer’s use of the property and including the taxable year, does not, during the first two-thirds of the useful
 life of the property, exceed the total of those allowances that would have been used had those allowances been computed under the method described in paragraph (2).

Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit or reduce an allowance otherwise allowable under subdivision (a).

(c) Any grapevine replaced in a vineyard in California in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1992, as a direct result of a phylloxera infestation in that vineyard, and any grapevine replaced in a vineyard in California in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, as a direct result of Pierce’s disease in that vineyard, shall have a useful life of five years, except that it shall have a class life of 10 years for purposes of depreciation under Section 168(g)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code where the taxpayer has made an election under Section 263A(d)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code not to
 capitalize costs of the infested vineyard. Every taxpayer claiming a deduction under this section with respect to a grapevine as described in this subdivision shall obtain a written certification from an independent state-certified integrated pest management adviser, or a state agricultural commissioner or adviser, that specifies that the replanting was necessary to restore a vineyard infested with phylloxera or Pierce’s disease. The taxpayer shall retain the certification for future audit purposes.

(d) For purposes of this part, the deduction for property leased to governments and other tax-exempt entities, as defined in Section 168(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be limited to the amount determined under Section 168(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alternative depreciation system for certain property.

(e) (1) In the case of any building
 erected or improvements made on leased property, if the building or improvement is property to which this section applies, the depreciation deduction shall be determined under the provisions of this section.

(2) An improvement shall be treated for purposes of determining gain or loss under this part as disposed of by the lessor when so disposed of or abandoned if both of the following occur:

(A) The improvement is made by the lessor of leased property for the lessee of that property.

(B) The improvement is irrevocably disposed of or abandoned by the lessor at the termination of the lease by the lessee.

This subdivision shall not apply to any property to which Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply for federal purposes by reason of Section 168(f) of the
 Internal Revenue Code. Any election made under Section 168(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code for federal purposes with respect to that property shall be treated as a binding election for state purposes under this subdivision with respect to that same property and no separate election under subdivision (e) of Section 23051.5 with respect to that property shall be allowed.

(3) (A) In determining a lease term, both of the following shall apply:

(i) There shall be taken into account options to renew.

(ii) Two or more successive leases which are part of the same transaction (or a series of related transactions) with respect to the same or substantially similar property shall be treated as one lease.

(B) For purposes of clause (i) of
 subparagraph (A), in the case of nonresidential real property or residential rental property, there shall not be taken into account any option to renew at fair market value determined at the time of renewal.

(f) (1) Section 167(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to depreciation under income forecast method, shall apply except as otherwise provided.

(2) Section 167(g)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “Section 19521” in lieu of “Section 460(b)(7)” of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3) Section 167(g)(5)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) (other than Article 2 (commencing with Section 19021) and Sections 19142 to 19150, inclusive)” in lieu of “Subtitle F (other than Sections 6654 and 6655).”

(4) Section 167(g)(5)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of distribution costs, shall not apply.

(5) Section 167(g)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of participations and residuals, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 60.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

24349.1.

(a) Section 280F of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitations on depreciation for luxury automobiles and certain property used for personal purposes, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), Section 280F of the Internal Revenue Code shall be modified as follows:

(1) The terms “deduction” or “recovery deduction,” relating to amounts allowable as a deduction under Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, mean the amount allowable as a deduction for depreciation under this part.

(2) The term “recovery period,” relating to property under
 Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, means the class life asset depreciation range allowable under this part.

(3) The provisions of Section 280F of the Internal Revenue Code which relate to the investment tax credit shall not be applicable for purposes of this part.

(c) Paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) shall not apply to Section 24356.7 property.

(d) The amendments made by Section 13202(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 280F of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on depreciation for luxury automobiles; limitation where certain property used for personal purposes, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 92.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24349.2.

Section 280G of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to golden parachute payments, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 67.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

24350.

Paragraphs (2), (3), and (4) of Section 24349(b) shall apply only in the case of property (other than intangible property) described in Section 24349(a) with a useful life of three years or more—

(a) The construction, reconstruction, or erection of which is completed after December 31, 1958, and then only to that portion of the basis which is properly attributable to such construction, reconstruction, or erection after December 31, 1958; or

(b) Acquired after December 31, 1958, if the original use
 of such property commences with the taxpayer and commences after such date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1127.)
-------------------------------------------

24351.

Where, under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, the taxpayer and the Franchise Tax Board have, after the date of enactment of this section, entered into an agreement in writing specifically dealing with the useful life and rate of depreciation of any property, the rate so agreed upon shall be binding on both the taxpayer and the Franchise Tax Board in the absence of facts or circumstances not taken into consideration in the adoption of such agreement. The responsibility of establishing the existence of such facts and circumstances shall rest
 with the party initiating the modification. Any change in the agreed rate and useful life specified in the agreement shall not be effective for taxable years before the taxable year in which notice in writing by certified mail or registered mail is served by the party to the agreement initiating such change.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 134.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24352.

In the absence of an agreement under Section 24351 containing a provision to the contrary, a taxpayer may at any time elect in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board to change from the method of depreciation described in Section 24349(b)(2) to the method described in Section 24349(b)(1).

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1127.)
-------------------------------------------

24352.5.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, a taxpayer may, for purposes of computing the allowance under Section 24349 with respect to personal property, reduce the amount taken into account as salvage value by an amount which does not exceed 10 percent of the basis of such property (as determined under Section 24353 as of the time as of which such salvage value is required to be determined).

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “personal property” means depreciable personal property (other than livestock) with a
 useful life of three years or more.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

24353.

(a) The basis on which exhaustion, wear and tear, and obsolescence are to be allowed in respect of any property shall be the adjusted basis provided in Section 24911 for the purpose of determining the gain on the sale or other disposition of the property.

(b) If any property is acquired subject to a lease, each of the following shall apply:

(1) No portion of the adjusted basis shall be allocated to the
 leasehold interest.

(2) The entire adjusted basis shall be taken into account in determining the depreciation deduction, if any, with respect to the property subject to lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 861, Sec. 8.   Effective September 27, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

24354.

In the case of property held by one person for life with remainder to another person, the deduction shall be computed as if the life tenant were the absolute owner of the property and shall be allowed to the life tenant. In the case of property held in trust, the allowable deduction shall be apportioned between the income beneficiaries and the trustee in accordance with the pertinent provisions of the instrument creating the trust, or, in the absence of such provisions on the basis of the trust income allocable to each.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1127.)
-------------------------------------------

24354.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this section, in the case of property of the type defined in Section 1250(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, subdivision (b) of Section 24349 shall not apply and the term “reasonable allowance” as used in subdivision (a) of Section 24349 shall include an allowance computed in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, under any
 of the following methods:(1) The straight line method,(2) The declining balance method, using a rate not exceeding 150 percent of the rate which would have been used had the annual allowance been computed under the method described in paragraph (1), or(3) Any other consistent method productive of an annual allowance which, when added to all allowances for the period commencing with the taxpayer’s use of the property and including the taxable year, does not, during the first two-thirds of the useful life of the property, exceed the total of such allowances which would have been used had such allowances been computed under the method described in paragraph (2).Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit or reduce an allowance otherwise allowable under subdivision (a) of Section 24349 except where allowable solely by reason of paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 24349.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) of this section shall not apply, and subdivision (b) of Section 24349 shall apply in any taxable year, to a building or structure—

(A) Which is residential rental property located within the United States or any of its possessions, or located within a foreign country if a method of depreciation for such property comparable to the method provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 24349 is provided by the laws of such country and

(B) The original use of
 which commences with the taxpayer. In the case of residential rental property located within a foreign country, the original use of which commences with the taxpayer, if the allowance for depreciation provided under the laws of such country for such property is greater than that provided under subdivision (a) of this section, but less than that provided under subdivision (b) of Section 24349, the allowance for depreciation under subdivision (b) of Section 24349 shall be limited to the amount provided under the laws of such country.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), a building or structure shall be considered to be residential rental property for any taxable year only if 80 percent or more of the gross rental income from such building or structure for such year is rental income from dwelling units (within the meaning of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 24354.2. For purposes of the preceding sentence, if any portion of such building
 or structure is occupied by the taxpayer, the gross rental income from such building or structure shall include the rental value of the portion so occupied.

(3) Any change in the computation of the allowance for depreciation for any taxable year, permitted or required by reason of the application of paragraph (1), shall not be considered a change in a method of accounting.

(c) Subdivision (a) of this section shall not apply, and subdivision (b) of Section 24349 shall apply, in the case of property—

(1) The construction, reconstruction, or erection of which was begun before January 1, 1971, or

(2) For which a written contract entered into before January 1, 1971, with respect to any part of the construction, reconstruction, or erection or for the
 permanent financing thereof, was on January 1, 1971, and at all times thereafter, binding on the taxpayer.

(d) Except as provided in subdivision (e), in the case of property of the type defined in Section 1250(c) of the Internal Revenue Code acquired after December 31, 1970, the original use of which does not commence with the taxpayer, the allowance for depreciation under Sections 24349 to 24354.2, inclusive, shall be limited to an amount computed under—

(1) The straight line method, or

(2) Any other method determined by the Franchise Tax Board to result in a reasonable allowance under subdivision (a) of Section 24349, not including—

(A) Any declining balance method,

(B) The sum of the
 years-digits method, or

(C) Any other method allowable solely by reason of the application of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 24349 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of this section.

(e) In the case of property of the type defined in Section 1250(c) of the Internal Revenue Code which is residential rental property (as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b)) acquired after December 31, 1970, having a useful life of 20 years or more, the original use of which does not commence with the taxpayer, the allowance for depreciation under Sections 24349 to 24354.2, inclusive, shall be limited to an amount computed under—

(1) The straight line method,

(2) The declining balance method, using a rate not exceeding 125 percent of the rate which
 would have been used had the annual allowance been computed under the method described in paragraph (1), or

(3) Any other method determined by the Franchise Tax Board to result in a reasonable allowance under subdivision (a) of Section 24349, not including—

(A) The sum of the years-digits method,

(B) Any declining balance method using a rate in excess of the rate permitted under paragraph (2), or

(C) Any other method allowable solely by reason of the application of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 24349 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of this section.

(f) (1) For purposes of subdivisions (b), (d), and (e), if property of the type defined in Section
 1250(c) of the Internal Revenue Code which is not property described in subdivision (a) of Section 24349 when its original use commences, becomes property described in subdivision (a) of Section 24349 after December 31, 1970, such property shall not be treated as property the original use of which commences with the taxpayer.

(2) Subdivisions (d) and (e) shall not apply in the case of property of the type defined in Section 1250(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, acquired after December 31, 1970, pursuant to a written contract for the acquisition of such property or for the permanent financing thereof, which was, on December 31, 1970, and at all times thereafter, binding on the taxpayer.

(g) This section shall not apply to public utility property which means property used predominantly in the trade or business of the furnishing or sale of—(1) Electrical energy, water, or sewage disposal services,(2) Gas or steam through a local distribution system,(3) Telephone services, or other communication services if furnished or sold by the Communications Satellite Corporation for purposes authorized by the Communications Satellite Act of 1962 (47 U.S.C. 701), or(4) Transportation of gas or steam by pipeline, if the rates for such furnishing or sale, as the case may be, have been established or approved by a state or political subdivision thereof, by any agency or
 instrumentality of the United States, or by a public service or public utility commission or other similar body of any state or political subdivision thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 135.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

24355.

Section 167(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of property excluded from Section 197, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 611, Sec. 83.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

24355.3.

For purposes of computing the depreciation deduction pursuant to Section 24349, the useful life of any Alaska natural gas pipeline, as defined in Section 168(i)(16) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall be seven years.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 24355.5 (as renumbered by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 493) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 293.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

24355.4.

For purposes of computing the depreciation deduction under Section 24349, a class life of four years shall be used for any qualified rent-to-own property as defined in Section 168(i)(14) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 80.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24355.5.

Section 197 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amortization of goodwill and certain other intangibles, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 35.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

24356.

(a) (1) In the case of Section 24356 property, the term “reasonable allowance” as used in subdivision (a) of Section 24349, may, at the election of the taxpayer, include an allowance, for the first taxable year for which a deduction is allowable under Sections 24349 through 24354 to the taxpayer with respect to such property, of 20 percent of the cost of that property.

(2) If in any one taxable year the cost of Section 24349 property with respect to which the taxpayer may elect an allowance under paragraph (1) for that taxable year exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), then paragraph (1) applies with respect to those items selected by the taxpayer, but only to the
 extent of an aggregate cost of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) (1) In lieu of subdivision (a), Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election to expense certain depreciable business assets, applies, except as otherwise provided.

(2) Section 179(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to dollar limitation, does not apply and in lieu thereof, the aggregate cost that may be taken into account under Section 179(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, for any taxable year, shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(3) Section 179(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reduction in limitation, does not apply and in lieu thereof, the limitation under paragraph
 (2), for any taxable year, shall be reduced, but not below zero, by the amount by which the cost of Section 179 property, as defined in Section 179(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided, that is placed in service during the taxable year, exceeds two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(4) Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to provide that the “aggregate amount disallowed” referred to in Section 179(b)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be computed under this part as that section read on the date the property generating the amount disallowed was placed in service.

(5) Section 179(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to elections, shall not apply.

(6) Section
 179(d)(1)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to computer software, shall not apply.

(7) Section 179(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for qualified disaster assistance property, shall not apply.

(c) (1) The election under this section for any taxable year shall be made within the time prescribed by law (including extensions thereof) for filing the return for such taxable year. The election shall be made in such manner as the Franchise Tax Board may by regulations prescribe.

(2) Any election made under this section shall not be revoked except with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, the term “Section 24356 property” means tangible personal property:

(A) Of a character subject to the allowance for depreciation under Sections 24349 through 24354;

(B) Acquired by purchase after December 31, 1958, for use in a trade or business, and

(C) With a useful life (determined at the time of such acquisition) of six years or more.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the term “purchase” means any acquisition of property, but only if:

(A) The property is not acquired from a person whose relationship to the person acquiring it would result in the
 disallowance of losses under Section 24427 (but, in applying Section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to losses, expenses, and interest with respect to transactions between related taxpayers, for purposes of this section, Section 267(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be treated as providing that the family of an individual shall include only the individual’s spouse, ancestors, and lineal descendants);

(B) The property is not acquired by one member of an affiliated group from another member of the same affiliated group, and

(C) The basis of the property in the hands of the person acquiring it is not determined in whole or in part by reference to the adjusted basis of that property in the hands of the person from whom acquired.

(3) For purposes of this section, the cost of property does not include so much of the basis of such property as is determined by reference to the basis of other property held at any time by the person acquiring that property.

(4) For purposes of subdivision (a) and subdivision (b) of this section:

(A) All members of an affiliated group shall be treated as one taxpayer, and

(B) The Franchise Tax Board shall apportion the dollar limitation contained in subdivision (a) or subdivision (b) among the members of the affiliated group in the manner as it shall by regulations prescribe.

(5) For purposes of paragraphs (2) and (4), the term “affiliated group”
 has the meaning assigned to it by Section 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that, for those purposes, the phrase “more than 50 percent” shall be substituted for the phrase “at least 80 percent” each place it appears in Section 1504(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(6) In applying Section 24353, the adjustment under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 24916, resulting by reason of an election made under this section with respect to any Section 24356 property, shall be made before any other deduction allowed by subdivision (a) of Section 24349 is computed.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe those regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 93.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24356.1.

(a) The amendments made by Section 124 of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to elections to expense certain depreciable business assets, shall not apply.

(b) The amendments made by Section 13101 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to elections to expense certain depreciable business assets, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 94.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

24357.

(a) There shall be allowed as a deduction any charitable contribution, as defined in Section 24359, the payment of which is made within the taxable year. A charitable contribution shall be allowable as a deduction only if verified under regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) (1) In the case of a corporation reporting its income on the accrual basis, the corporation may elect to treat the contribution as paid during that taxable year if both of the following occur:

(A) The board of directors authorizes a charitable contribution during the taxable year.

(B) Payment of the contribution is made after the close of that taxable year and on or before the 15th day of the fourth month following the close of the taxable year.

(2) The election allowed by paragraph (1) may be made only at the time of the filing of the return for the taxable year, and shall be signified in the manner as the Franchise Tax Board shall by regulations prescribe.

(c) For purposes of this section, payment of a charitable contribution that consists of a future interest in tangible personal property shall be treated as made only when all intervening interests in, and rights to the actual possession or enjoyment of, the property have expired or are held by persons other than the taxpayer or those standing in a relationship to the taxpayer described in Section
 24428. For purposes of the preceding sentence, a fixture which is intended to be severed from the real property shall be treated as tangible personal property.

(d) No deduction shall be allowed under this section for traveling expenses (including amounts expended for meals and lodging) while away from home, whether paid directly or by reimbursement, unless there is no significant element of personal pleasure, recreation, or vacation in that travel.

(e) (1) Section 170(f)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to substantiation requirement for certain contributions, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) No deduction shall be denied under Section 170(f)(8) of the Internal
 Revenue Code, relating to substantiation requirement for certain contributions, upon a showing that the requirements in Section 170(f)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code have been met with respect to that contribution for federal purposes.

(f) Section 170(f)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to denial of deduction where contribution for lobbying activities, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for purposes of this section and Section 24341, Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to charitable, etc., contributions and gifts, shall be applied to allow a taxpayer to elect to treat any contribution described in paragraph (2) made in January 2005, as if that contribution was made
 on December 31, 2004, and not in January 2005.

(2) A contribution is described in this paragraph if that contribution is a cash contribution made for the relief of victims in areas affected by the December 26, 2004, Indian Ocean tsunami for which a charitable contribution deduction is allowable under this section.

(h) (1) Section 170(f)(11)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified appraisal and appraiser, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to appraisals prepared with respect to returns or submissions filed on or after January 1, 2010.

(i) (1) Section 170(f)(16)
 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to contributions of clothing and household items, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to contributions made on or after January 1, 2010.

(j) (1) Section 170(f)(17) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to recordkeeping, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to contributions made on or after January 1, 2010.

(k) (1) Section 170(o) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for fractional gifts, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to contributions made on or after January 1, 2010.

(l) (1) (A) The amendments made by Section 605(a)(1) of Public Law 117-328 adding paragraph (7) to Section 170(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on deduction for qualified conservation contributions made by passthrough entities, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(B) Section 170(h)(7)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to regulations, as added by Section 605(a)(1) of Public Law 117-328, shall not apply.

(C) Section 605(a)(3) of Public Law 117-328, relating to extension of statute of limitations for listed transactions, shall apply and is modified
 by substituting “Section 19755” for “sections 6501(c)(10) and 6235(c)(6) of such Code.”

(2) The amendments made by Section 605(b) of Public Law 117-328 adding paragraph (19) to Section 170(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain qualified conservation contributions, shall apply.

(3) This subdivision shall apply to contributions made on or after January 1, 2024.

(m) Section 605(d)(2) of Public Law 117-328, relating to opportunity to correct, shall apply.
